Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-526
Ferrets; use or possession prohibited, when; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful (1) to hunt rabbits, squirrels, or any fur-bearing animal with or by the aid of a ferret, (2) to place a ferret in any hole or opening in the ground or in any stone, wall, log, or hollow tree where rabbits, squirrels, or any fur-bearing animals may be found or thought to be, or (3) to have a ferret in one's possession or control in a field or forest or in any vehicle going to or from hunting territory. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1929, c. 112, V, § 12, p. 430;

C.S.1929, § 37-512;

R.S.1943, § 37-512;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-512;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 246.